Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1053.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) The governing body of a local governmental unit by resolution may designate 1 or more neighborhood enterprise zones within that local governmental unit. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a neighborhood enterprise zone shall must contain not less than 10 platted parcels of land. A neighborhood enterprise zone located in a qualified downtown revitalization district may contain less than 10 platted parcels if the platted parcels together contain 10 or more facilities. All the land within a neighborhood enterprise zone shall must also be compact and contiguous. Contiguity is not broken by a road, right-of-way, or property purchased or taken under condemnation if the purchased or condemned property was a single parcel prior to before the sale or condemnation. (2) The total acreage of the neighborhood enterprise zones containing only new facilities or rehabilitated facilities, or any a combination of new facilities or and rehabilitated facilities, designated under this act shall must not exceed 15% 20% of the total acreage contained within the boundaries of the local governmental unit. The total acreage of the neighborhood enterprise zones containing only homestead facilities designated under this act shall must not exceed 10% of the total acreage contained within the boundaries of the local governmental unit or, with the approval of the board of commissioners of the county in which the neighborhood enterprise zone is located if the county does not have an elected or appointed county executive or with the approval of the board of commissioners and the county executive of the county in which the neighborhood enterprise zone is located if the county has an elected or appointed county executive, 15% 20% of the total acreage contained within the boundaries of the local governmental unit. (3) Not less than 60 days before the passage of a resolution designating a neighborhood enterprise zone or the repeal or amendment of a resolution under subsection (5), the clerk of the local governmental unit shall give written notice to the assessor and to the governing body of each taxing unit that levies ad valorem property taxes in the proposed neighborhood enterprise zone. Before acting upon on the resolution, the governing body of the local governmental unit shall make a finding that a proposed neighborhood enterprise zone is consistent with the master plan of the local governmental unit and the neighborhood preservation and economic development goals of the local governmental unit. The governing body before acting upon on the resolution shall also adopt a statement of the local governmental unit's goals, objectives, and policies relative to the maintenance, preservation, improvement, and development of housing for all persons regardless of income level living within the proposed neighborhood enterprise zone. Additionally, before acting upon on the resolution, the governing body of a local governmental unit with a population greater than 20,000 shall pass a housing inspection ordinance. A local governmental unit with a population of 20,000 or less may pass a housing inspection ordinance. Before the sale of a unit in a new or rehabilitated facility for which a neighborhood enterprise zone certificate is in effect, an inspection shall must be made of the unit to determine compliance with any local construction or safety codes and that a sale may not be finalized until there is compliance with those local construction or safety codes. The governing body shall hold a public hearing not later than 45 days after the date the notice is sent but before acting upon on the resolution. (4) Upon On receipt of a notice under subsection (3), the assessor shall determine and furnish to the governing body of the local governmental unit the amount of the true cash value of the property located within the proposed neighborhood enterprise zone and any other information considered necessary by the governing body. (5) A resolution designating a neighborhood enterprise zone, other than a zone designated under subsection (2), may be repealed or amended not sooner than 3 years after the date of adoption or of the most recent amendment of the resolution by the governing body of the local governmental unit. The repeal or amendment of the resolution shall take takes effect 6 months after adoption. However, an action taken under this subsection does not invalidate a certificate that is issued or in effect and a facility for which a certificate is issued or in effect shall continue continues to be included in the total acreage limitations under this section until the certificate is expired or revoked. (6) A resolution designating a neighborhood enterprise zone in an obsolete property rehabilitation district that was created by a local unit of government on June 6, 2003, and for which the state tax commission issued obsolete property rehabilitation certificates on August 26, 2003, and September 24, 2003 will cause any previous certificate to expire on the December 30 immediately preceding the December 31 on which the first neighborhood enterprise zone certificate is effective. The taxable value of the parcel shall must be calculated using the value of the parcel before the building permit was issued. This subdivision subsection authorizes an amended obsolete property rehabilitation certificate approved by the state tax commission for the portion of the parcel contained in the original certificate for which an application for a neighborhood enterprise zone certificate was not submitted. (7) Beginning June 1, 2023, in addition to all other requirements under this act, both of the following apply in a city, township, or village that became a local governmental unit pursuant to the amendatory act that added this subsection:2022 PA 238: (a) A local governmental unit may designate a neighborhood enterprise zone only if the local governmental unit determines that both of the following are met: (i) The designation encourages compact development and the neighborhood enterprise zone contains 5 or more existing residential units per acre at the time of designation. (ii) The neighborhood enterprise zone is adjacent to existing development, can utilize existing infrastructure, and has access to municipal water and sewer services on at least 1 frontage. (b) Notwithstanding section 9, for that part of a facility that in the prior year was occupied by an individual, couple, family, or group of unrelated individuals with a combined adjusted household income in excess of 120% of the countywide area median income as posted by the Michigan state housing development authority on its website, the specific tax paid in lieu of taxes for the year must be equal to the full amount of the taxes that would be paid on that portion of the facility if the facility were not tax exempt. (8) As used in this section, "adjusted household income" means that term as defined in R 125.101 of the Michigan Administrative Code.